src/fst/test/dict-gt-yamls/N-loaqdd_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:


  Noun - låʹdd: # Noun a-stem 'bird/lintu' - full paradigm
# 
     låʹdd+N+Sg+Nom: låʹdd
     låʹdd+N+Sg+Gen: lååʹdd
     låʹdd+N+Sg+Acc: lååʹdd
     låʹdd+N+Sg+Ill: lådda
     låʹdd+N+Sg+Loc: lååʹddest
     låʹdd+N+Sg+Com: looʹddin
     låʹdd+N+Ess: låʹdden
     låʹdd+N+Par: låʹdded
     låʹdd+N+Sg+Abe: [lååʹddtaa, lååʹddtää]
     låʹdd+N+Pl+Nom: lååʹdd
     låʹdd+N+Pl+Gen: looʹddi
     låʹdd+N+Pl+Acc: looʹddid
     låʹdd+N+Pl+Ill: looʹddid
     låʹdd+N+Pl+Loc: looʹddin
     låʹdd+N+Pl+Com: looʹddivuiʹm
     låʹdd+N+Pl+Abe: [looʹdditaa, looʹdditää]
     låʹdd+N+Der/Dim+N+Sg+Nom: lååddaž
     låʹdd+N+Der/Dim+N+Sg+Gen: låådda
     låʹdd+N+Der/Dim+N+Sg+Acc: låådda
     låʹdd+N+Der/Dim+N+Sg+Ill: lååddže
     låʹdd+N+Der/Dim+N+Sg+Loc: lååddast
     låʹdd+N+Der/Dim+N+Sg+Com: lååddain
     låʹdd+N+Der/Dim+N+Sg+Abe: [lååddataa, lååddatää]
     låʹdd+N+Der/Dim+N+Ess: lååddžen
     låʹdd+N+Der/Dim+N+Par: lååddžed
     låʹdd+N+Der/Dim+N+Pl+Nom: låådda
     låʹdd+N+Der/Dim+N+Pl+Gen: lååddai
     låʹdd+N+Der/Dim+N+Pl+Acc: lååddaid
     låʹdd+N+Der/Dim+N+Pl+Ill: lååddaid
     låʹdd+N+Der/Dim+N+Pl+Loc: lååddain
     låʹdd+N+Der/Dim+N+Pl+Com: lååddaivuiʹm
     låʹdd+N+Der/Dim+N+Pl+Abe: [lååddaitaa, lååddaitää]
# according to Pekka 1991: 163--164
     låʹdd+N+Der/Dim+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: lååddžam
     låʹdd+N+Der/Dim+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: lååddžan
     låʹdd+N+Der/Dim+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: lååddžan
     låʹdd+N+Der/Dim+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg1: lååddžasan
     låʹdd+N+Der/Dim+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: [lådstan, lååddstan]
     låʹdd+N+Der/Dim+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: lååddainan
     låʹdd+N+Der/Dim+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg1: [lååddžantaa, lååddžantää]
     låʹdd+N+Der/Dim+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: lååddžan
     låʹdd+N+Der/Dim+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: [lååddään, lååddaan]
     låʹdd+N+Der/Dim+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: [lååddään, lååddaan]
     låʹdd+N+Der/Dim+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg1: [lååddään, lååddaan]
     låʹdd+N+Der/Dim+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: lååddainan
     låʹdd+N+Der/Dim+N+Pl+Com+PxSg1: [lååddäänvuiʹm, lååddaanvuiʹm]
     låʹdd+N+Der/Dim+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg1: [lååddääntaa, lååddaantaa, lååddääntää, lååddaantää]

     låʹdd+N+Der/Dim+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: lååddžad
     låʹdd+N+Der/Dim+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: lååddžad
     låʹdd+N+Der/Dim+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: lååddžad
     låʹdd+N+Der/Dim+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg2: lååddžasad
     låʹdd+N+Der/Dim+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: [lådstad, lååddstad]
     låʹdd+N+Der/Dim+N+Sg+Com+PxSg2: lååddainad
     låʹdd+N+Der/Dim+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg2: [lååddžadtaa, lååddžadtää]
     låʹdd+N+Der/Dim+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: lååddžad
     låʹdd+N+Der/Dim+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: [lååddääd, lååddaad]
     låʹdd+N+Der/Dim+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: [lååddääd, lååddaad]
     låʹdd+N+Der/Dim+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: [lååddääd, lååddaad]
     låʹdd+N+Der/Dim+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg2: lååddainad
     låʹdd+N+Der/Dim+N+Pl+Com+PxSg2: [lååddäädvuiʹm, lååddaadvuiʹm]
     låʹdd+N+Der/Dim+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg2: [lååddäädtaa, lååddaadtaa, lååddäädtää, lååddaadtää]

     låʹdd+N+Der/Dim+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: lååddžes
     låʹdd+N+Der/Dim+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: lååddžes
     låʹdd+N+Der/Dim+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: lååddžes
     låʹdd+N+Der/Dim+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg3: lååddžasas
     låʹdd+N+Der/Dim+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: [lådstes, lååddstes]
     låʹdd+N+Der/Dim+N+Sg+Com+PxSg3: lååddaines
     låʹdd+N+Der/Dim+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg3: [lååddžestaa, lååddžestää]
     låʹdd+N+Der/Dim+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: lååddžes
     låʹdd+N+Der/Dim+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: lååddees
     låʹdd+N+Der/Dim+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: lååddees
     låʹdd+N+Der/Dim+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg3: lååddees
     låʹdd+N+Der/Dim+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg3: lååddaines
     låʹdd+N+Der/Dim+N+Pl+Com+PxSg3: lååddeesvuiʹm
     låʹdd+N+Der/Dim+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg3: [lååddeestaa, lååddeestää]

     låʹdd+N+Der/Dim+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: lååddžeem
     låʹdd+N+Der/Dim+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: lååddžeen
     låʹdd+N+Der/Dim+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: lååddžeen
     låʹdd+N+Der/Dim+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl1: lååddžeʹsen
     låʹdd+N+Der/Dim+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: [lådsteen, lååddsteen]
     låʹdd+N+Der/Dim+N+Sg+Com+PxPl1: lååddaineen
     låʹdd+N+Der/Dim+N+Sg+Abe+PxPl1: [lååddžeentaa, lååddžeentää]
     låʹdd+N+Der/Dim+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: lååddžeen
     låʹdd+N+Der/Dim+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: lååddeen
     låʹdd+N+Der/Dim+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: lååddeen
     låʹdd+N+Der/Dim+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl1: lååddeen
     låʹdd+N+Der/Dim+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl1: lååddaineen
     låʹdd+N+Der/Dim+N+Pl+Com+PxPl1: lååddeenvuiʹm
     låʹdd+N+Der/Dim+N+Pl+Abe+PxPl1: [lååddeentaa, lååddeentää]

     låʹdd+N+Der/Dim+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: lååddžeed
     låʹdd+N+Der/Dim+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: lååddžeed
     låʹdd+N+Der/Dim+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: lååddžeed
     låʹdd+N+Der/Dim+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl2: lååddžeʹsed
     låʹdd+N+Der/Dim+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: [lådsteed, lååddsted]
     låʹdd+N+Der/Dim+N+Sg+Com+PxPl2: lååddaineed
     låʹdd+N+Der/Dim+N+Sg+Abe+PxPl2: [lååddžeedtaa, lååddžeedtää]
     låʹdd+N+Der/Dim+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: lååddžeed
     låʹdd+N+Der/Dim+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: lååddeed
     låʹdd+N+Der/Dim+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: lååddeed
     låʹdd+N+Der/Dim+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: lååddeed
     låʹdd+N+Der/Dim+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl2: lååddaineed
     låʹdd+N+Der/Dim+N+Pl+Com+PxPl2: lååddeedvuiʹm
     låʹdd+N+Der/Dim+N+Pl+Abe+PxPl2: [lååddeedtaa, lååddeedtää]

     låʹdd+N+Der/Dim+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: lååddžeez
     låʹdd+N+Der/Dim+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: lååddžeez
     låʹdd+N+Der/Dim+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: lååddžeez
     låʹdd+N+Der/Dim+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl3: lååddžeʹsez
     låʹdd+N+Der/Dim+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: [lådsteez, lååddsteez]
     låʹdd+N+Der/Dim+N+Sg+Com+PxPl3: lååddaineez
     låʹdd+N+Der/Dim+N+Sg+Abe+PxPl3: [lååddžeeztaa, lååddžeeztää]
     låʹdd+N+Der/Dim+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: lååddžeez
     låʹdd+N+Der/Dim+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: lååddeez
     låʹdd+N+Der/Dim+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: lååddeez
     låʹdd+N+Der/Dim+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl3: lååddeez
     låʹdd+N+Der/Dim+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: lååddaineez
     låʹdd+N+Der/Dim+N+Pl+Com+PxPl3: lååddeezvuiʹm
     låʹdd+N+Der/Dim+N+Pl+Abe+PxPl3: [lååddeeztaa, lååddeeztää]
